California statutes. Education Code
(2) In hearings that include an allegation of committing or attempting to commit a sexual assault as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 48900 or to commit a sexual battery as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 48900, evidence of specific instances, of a
 complaining witness’ prior sexual conduct is to be presumed inadmissible and shall not be heard absent a determination by the person conducting the hearing that extraordinary circumstances exist requiring the evidence be heard. Before the person conducting the hearing makes the determination on whether extraordinary circumstances exist requiring that specific instances of a complaining witness’ prior sexual conduct be heard, the complaining witness shall be provided notice and an opportunity to present opposition to the introduction of the evidence. In the hearing on the admissibility of the evidence, the complaining witness shall be entitled to be represented by a parent, guardian, legal counsel, or other support person. Reputation or opinion evidence regarding the sexual behavior of the complaining witness is not admissible for any purpose.

(i) (1) Before the hearing has commenced, the governing board of the school district may issue subpoenas at the request of either the superintendent of schools or the superintendent’s designee or the pupil, for the personal appearance of percipient witnesses at the hearing. After the hearing has commenced, the governing board
 of the school district or the hearing officer or administrative panel may, upon request of either the county superintendent of schools or the superintendent’s designee or the pupil, issue subpoenas. All subpoenas shall be issued in accordance with Sections 1985, 1985.1, and 1985.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Enforcement of subpoenas shall be done in accordance with Section 11455.20 of the Government Code.

(2) Any objection raised by the superintendent of schools or the superintendent’s designee or the pupil to the issuance of subpoenas may be considered by the governing board of the school district in closed session, or in open session, if so requested by the pupil before the meeting. Any decision by the governing board of the school district in response to an objection to the issuance of subpoenas shall be final and
 binding.

(3) If the governing board of the school district, hearing officer, or administrative panel determines, in accordance with subdivision (f), that a percipient witness would be subject to an unreasonable risk of harm by testifying at the hearing, a subpoena shall not be issued to compel the personal attendance of that witness at the hearing. However, that witness may be compelled to testify by means of a sworn declaration as provided for in subdivision (f).

(4) Service of process shall be extended to all parts of the state and shall be served in accordance with Section 1987 of the Code of Civil Procedure. All witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, other than the parties or officers or employees of the state or any political subdivision of the state, shall receive fees, and all
 witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, except the parties, shall receive mileage in the same amount and under the same circumstances as prescribed for witnesses in civil actions in a superior court. Fees and mileage shall be paid by the party at whose request the witness is subpoenaed.

(j) Whether an expulsion hearing is conducted by the governing board of the school district or before a hearing officer or administrative panel, final action to expel a pupil shall be taken only by the governing board of the school district in a public session. Written notice of any decision to expel or to suspend the enforcement of an expulsion order during a period of probation shall be sent by the superintendent of schools or his or her designee to the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian and shall be accompanied by all of the
 following:

(1) Notice of the right to appeal the expulsion to the county board of education.

(2) Notice of the education alternative placement to be provided to the pupil during the time of expulsion.

(3) Notice of the obligation of the parent, guardian, or pupil under subdivision (b) of Section 48915.1, upon the pupil’s enrollment in a new school district, to inform that school district of the pupil’s expulsion.

(k) (1) The governing board of the school district shall maintain a record of each expulsion, including the cause for the expulsion. Records of expulsions shall be nonprivileged, disclosable public records.

(2) The expulsion order and the causes for the expulsion shall be recorded in the pupil’s mandatory interim record and shall be forwarded to any school in which the pupil subsequently enrolls upon receipt of a request from the admitting school for the pupil’s school records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 837, Sec. 5.   (SB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

48918.1.

(a) If the decision is expulsion and the pupil is a foster child, as defined in Section 48853.5, the governing board of the school district shall provide notice of the expulsion hearing to the pupil’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker at least 10 calendar days before the date of the hearing. The notice may be made using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include, but is not limited to, email or a telephone call.

(b) (1) If the decision to recommend expulsion is a discretionary act and the pupil is a homeless child or youth, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the governing board of the school district shall provide notice of the expulsion hearing to the local
 educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code at least 10 calendar days before the date of the hearing. The notice may be made using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include, but is not limited to, email or a telephone call.

(2) If a recommendation of expulsion is required and the pupil is a homeless child or youth, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the governing board of the school district may provide notice of the expulsion hearing to the local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code at least 10 calendar days before the date of the hearing. The notice may be made using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include, but is not limited to, email or a telephone call.

(c) If the decision is expulsion and the pupil is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the governing board of the school district shall provide notice of the expulsion hearing to the pupil’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker at least 10 calendar days before the date of the hearing. The notice may be made using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include, but is not limited to, email or a telephone call.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 400, Sec. 8.   (AB 740)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48918.5.

In expulsion hearings involving allegations brought pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 48900, the governing board of each school district shall establish rules and regulations governing procedures. The procedures shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) At the time that the expulsion hearing is recommended, the complaining witness shall be provided with a copy of the applicable disciplinary rules and advised of his or her right to: (1) receive five days’ notice of the complaining witness’s scheduled testimony at the hearing, (2) have up to two adult support persons of his or her choosing, present in the hearing at the time he or she testifies; and (3) to have the hearing closed during the time they testify pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 48918.

(b) An expulsion hearing may be postponed for one schoolday in order to accommodate the special physical, mental, or emotional needs of a pupil who is the complaining witness where the allegations arise under subdivision (n) of Section 48900.

(c) The district shall provide a nonthreatening environment for a complaining witness in order to better enable them to speak freely and accurately of the experiences that are the subject of the expulsion hearing, and to prevent discouragement of complaints. Each school district shall provide a room separate from the hearing room for the use of the complaining witness prior to and during breaks in testimony. In the discretion of the person conducting the hearing, the complaining witness shall be allowed reasonable periods of relief from examination and cross-examination during which he or she may leave the hearing room. The person conducting the hearing may arrange the seating within the hearing room of those present in order to facilitate a less intimidating environment for the complaining witness. The person conducting the hearing may limit the time for taking the testimony of a complaining witness to the hours he or she is normally in school, if there is no good cause to take the testimony during other hours. The person conducting the hearing may permit one of the complaining witness’s support persons to accompany him or her to the witness stand.

(d) Whenever any allegation is made of conduct violative of subdivision (n) of Section 48900, complaining witnesses and accused pupils are to be advised immediately to refrain from personal or telephonic contact with each other during the pendency of any expulsion process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 915, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

48918.6.

In addition to any other immunity that may exist, any testimony provided by a pupil witness in an expulsion hearing conducted pursuant to this article is expressly deemed to be a communication protected by subdivision (b) of Section 47 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48919.

If a pupil is expelled from school, the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian may, within 30 days following the decision of the governing board to expel, file an appeal to the county board of education which shall hold a hearing thereon and render its decision.

The county board of education, or in a class 1 or class 2 county a hearing officer or impartial administrative panel, shall hold the hearing within 20 schooldays following the filing of a formal request under this section. If the county board of education hears the appeal without a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 48919.5, then the board shall render a decision within three schooldays of the hearing conducted pursuant to Section 48920, unless the pupil requests a postponement.

The period within which an appeal is to be filed shall be determined from the date a governing board votes to expel even if enforcement of the expulsion action is suspended and the pupil is placed on probation pursuant to Section 48917. A pupil who fails to appeal the original action of the board within the prescribed time may not subsequently appeal a decision of the board to revoke probation and impose the original order of expulsion.

The county board of education shall adopt rules and regulations establishing procedures for expulsion appeals conducted under this section. If the county board of education in a class 1 or class 2 county elects to use the procedures in Section 48919.5, then the board shall adopt rules and regulations establishing procedures for expulsion appeals conducted under Section 48919.5. The adopted rules and regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirements for filing a notice of appeal, the setting of a hearing date, the furnishing of notice to the pupil and the governing board regarding the appeal, the furnishing of a copy of the expulsion hearing record to the county board of education, procedures for the conduct of the hearing, and the preservation of the record of the appeal.

The pupil shall submit a written request for a copy of the written transcripts and supporting documents from the school district simultaneously with the filing of the notice of appeal with the county board of education. The school district shall provide the pupil with the transcriptions, supporting documents, and records within 10 schooldays following the pupil’s written request. Upon receipt of the records, the pupil shall immediately file suitable copies of these records with the county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

48919.5.

(a) A county board of education in a class 1 or class 2 county may have a hearing officer pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 27720) of Part 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code, or an impartial administrative panel of three or more certificated persons appointed by the county board of education, hear appeals filed pursuant to Section 48919. The members of the impartial administrative panel shall not be members of the governing board of the school district nor employees of the school district, from which the pupil filing the appeal was expelled. Neither the hearing officer, nor any member of the administrative panel, hearing a pupil’s appeal shall have been the hearing officer or a member of the administrative panel that conducted the pupil’s expulsion hearing.

(b) A hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall not issue a final order of the county board. The hearing officer or impartial administrative panel shall prepare a recommended decision, including any findings or conclusions required for that decision, and shall submit that recommendation and the record to the county board of education within three schooldays of hearing the appeal.

(c) Sections 48919, 48920, 48921, 48922, 48923, and 48925 are applicable to a hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(d) Within 10 schooldays of receiving the recommended decision and record from the hearing officer or the impartial administrative panel, the county board of education shall review the recommended decision and record and render a final order of the board.

(e) For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Countywide ADA” means the aggregate number of annual units of regular average daily attendance for the fiscal year in all school districts within the county.

(2) “Class 1 county” means a county with 1994/95 countywide ADA of more than 500,000.

(3) “Class 2 county” means a county with 1994/95 countywide ADA of at least 180,000 but less than 500,000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

48920.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 54950 of the Government Code and Section 35145 of this code, the county board of education shall hear an appeal of an expulsion order in closed session, unless the pupil requests, in writing, at least five days prior to the date of the hearing, that the hearing be conducted in a public meeting. Upon the timely submission of a request for a public meeting, the county board of education shall be required to honor the request. Whether the hearing is conducted in closed or public session, the county board may meet in closed session for the purpose of deliberations. If the county board admits any representative of the pupil or the school district, the board shall, at the same time, admit representatives from the opposing party.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 91.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48921.

The county board of education shall determine the appeal from a pupil expulsion upon the record of the hearing before the district governing board, together with such applicable documentation or regulations as may be ordered. No evidence other than that contained in the record of the proceedings of the school board may be heard unless a de novo proceeding is granted as provided in Section 48923.

It shall be the responsibility of the pupil to submit a written transcription for review by the county board. The cost of the transcript shall be borne by the pupil except in either of the following situations:

(1) Where the pupil’s parent or guardian certifies to the school district that he or she cannot reasonably afford the cost of the transcript because of limited income or exceptional necessary expenses, or both.

(2) In a case in which the county board reverses the decision of the local governing board, the county board shall require that the local board reimburse the pupil for the cost of such transcription.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 91.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48922.

(a) The review by the county board of education of the decision of the governing board shall be limited to the following questions:

(1) Whether the governing board acted without or in excess of its jurisdiction.

(2) Whether there was a fair hearing before the governing board.

(3) Whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion in the hearing.

(4) Whether there is relevant and material evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing before the governing board.

(b) As used in this section, a proceeding without or in excess of jurisdiction includes, but is not limited to, a situation where an expulsion hearing is not commenced within the time periods prescribed by this article, a situation where an expulsion order is not based upon the acts enumerated in Section 48900, or a situation involving acts not related to school activity or attendance.

(c) For purposes of this section, an abuse of discretion is established in any of the following situations:

(1) If school officials have not met the procedural requirements of this article.

(2) If the decision to expel a pupil is not supported by the findings prescribed by Section 48915.

(3) If the findings are not supported by the evidence.

A county board of education may not reverse the decision of a governing board to expel a pupil based upon a finding of an abuse of discretion unless the county board of education also determines that the abuse of discretion was prejudicial.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 91.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48923.

The decision of the county board shall be limited as follows:

(a) If the county board finds that relevant and material evidence exists which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing before the governing board, it may do either of the following:

(1) Remand the matter to the governing board for reconsideration and may in addition order the pupil reinstated pending the reconsideration.

(2) Grant a hearing de novo upon reasonable notice thereof to the pupil and to the governing board. The hearing shall be conducted in conformance with the rules and regulations adopted by the county board under Section 48919.

(b) If the county board determines that the decision of the governing board is not supported by the findings required to be made by Section 48915, but evidence supporting the required findings exists in the record of the proceedings, the county board shall remand the matter to the governing board for adoption of the required findings. This remand for the adoption and inclusion of the required findings shall not result in an additional hearing pursuant to Section 48918, except that final action to expel the pupil based on the revised findings of fact shall meet all requirements of subdivisions (j) and (k) of Section 48918.

(c) In all other cases, the county board shall enter an order either affirming or reversing the decision of the governing board. In any case in which the county board enters a decision reversing the local board, the county board may direct the local board to expunge the record of the pupil and the records of the district of any references to the expulsion action and the expulsion shall be deemed not to have occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 147, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

48924.

The decision of the county board of education shall be final and binding upon the pupil and upon the governing board of the school district. The pupil and the governing board shall be notified of the final order of the county board, in writing, either by personal service or by certified mail. The order shall become final when rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 91.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48925.

As used in this article:

(a) “Day” means a calendar day unless otherwise specifically provided.

(b) “Expulsion” means removal of a pupil from (1) the immediate supervision and control, or (2) the general supervision, of school personnel, as those terms are used in Section 46300.

(c) “Schoolday” means a day upon which the schools of the district are in session or weekdays during the summer recess.

(d) “Suspension” means removal of a pupil from ongoing instruction for adjustment purposes. However, “suspension” does not mean any of the following:

(1) Reassignment to another education program or class at the same school where the pupil will receive continuing instruction for the length of day prescribed by the governing board for pupils of the same grade level.

(2) Referral to a certificated employee designated by the principal to advise pupils.

(3) Removal from the class, but without reassignment to another class or program, for the remainder of the class period without sending the pupil to the principal or the principal’s designee as provided in Section 48910. Removal from a particular class shall not occur more than once every five schooldays.

(e) “Pupil” includes a pupil’s parent or guardian or legal counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 91.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48926.

(a) (1) Each county superintendent of schools in counties that operate community schools pursuant to Section 1980, in conjunction with superintendents of the school districts within the county, shall develop a plan for providing education services, including any services that may be required pursuant to a pupil’s individualized education program or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), to all expelled pupils in that county. The plan shall be adopted by the governing board of each school district within the county and by the county board of education.

(2) The plan shall accomplish all of the following:

(A) Enumerate existing educational alternatives for expelled pupils.

(B) Identify gaps in educational services to expelled pupils and recommend strategies for filling those service gaps.

(C) Identify multiple educational programs and services.

(D) Outline a timely readmission process after the expulsion term is complete.

(E) Describe the steps to be taken by the school district, in collaboration with the county office of education, to support the successful transition of a pupil upon readmission.

(F) Identify alternative placements for pupils
 who are expelled and placed in district community day school programs, but who fail to substantially meet the terms and conditions of their rehabilitation plan.

(b) Each county superintendent of schools, in conjunction with the superintendents of the school districts, shall submit to the Superintendent the county plan for providing educational services to all expelled pupils in the county no later than June 30, 1997, and shall submit a triennial update to the plan to the
 Superintendent that reflects the outcome data pursuant to Section 48916.1, on June 30 thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 294, Sec. 3.   (AB 1230)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48927.

(a) This chapter shall also apply to pupils attending the California School for the Blind and the two California Schools for the Deaf, which shall be referred to as the “state special schools.”

(b) Because the state special schools have a governance structure different from that of school districts, for the purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Superintendent” means the appropriate principal of the state special school in which the pupil is enrolled, or the principal’s designee, for purposes of Sections 48900, 48900.2, 48900.3, 48900.4, 48900.5, 48900.7, and 48911, and subdivisions (a) and (j) of Section 48918.

(2) “Governing board of each school district,” “governing board of any school district,” or “each governing board of a school district” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 48900.1, subdivision (b) of Section 48901, subdivision (b) of Section 48901.5, Section 48907, Section 48910, the first paragraph of Section 48918, and the first paragraph of Section 48918.5.

(3) “Governing board” means the Superintendent of the State Special School in which the pupil is enrolled for purposes of Section 48912, subdivision (d) of Section 48915, Section 48915.5, Section 48916, Section 48917, subdivisions (a), (c), (d), (f), (h), (i), (j), and (k) of Section 48918, and Sections 48921, 48922, 48923, and 48924.

(4) “Governing board” means the governing board of the district of residence of the expelled pupil for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 48915 and Section 48916.1. In the case of an adult pupil expelled from a state special school, “governing board” means the governing board of the school district that referred the pupil to the state special school for purposes of the code section cited in this paragraph.

(5) “Superintendent of schools or the governing board” means the appropriate principal of the state special school in which the pupil is enrolled, or the principal’s designee, for the purposes of Section 48900.6.

(6) “School district” or “district” means the state special school in which the pupil is enrolled for purposes of Section 48900.8, subdivision (b) of Section 48903, Section 48905, Section 48909, Section 48914, paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 48916.1, subdivision (c) of Section 48918.5, Section 48919, Section 48920, and Section 48921.

(7) “County board of education” or “county board” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee for purposes of Sections 48920, 48921, 48922, 48923, and 48924.

(8) “Local educational agency” includes a state special school for purposes of Section 48902 and Section 48915.5.

(9) “A change in placement” for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 48915.5 means a referral by the state special school to the pupil’s school district of residence for placement in an appropriate interim alternative educational setting.

(10) “Individualized education program team” means the individualized education program team of the pupil’s school district of residence with appropriate representation from the state special school in which the pupil is enrolled for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 48915.5.2.

(11) “Individualized education program team” means the individualized education program team of the state special school in which the pupil is enrolled with appropriate representation from the pupil’s school district of residence for purposes of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 48915.5.3.

(c) Subdivision (b) of this section shall be deemed to provide the same due process procedural protections to pupils in the state special schools as afforded to pupils in the public school districts of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 56.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Transfer of Pupil Convicted of Violent Felony or Misdemeanor [48929. - 48929.]

48929.

Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district may transfer to another school in that school district a pupil enrolled in that school district who has been convicted of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, or convicted of a misdemeanor listed in Section 29805 of the Penal Code if the pupil to be transferred and the victim of the crime for which the pupil was convicted are enrolled at the same school, subject to satisfaction of both of the following conditions:

(a) The governing board of the school district has adopted a policy at a regularly scheduled meeting that contains all of the following provisions:

(1) A requirement that the pupil and pupil’s parent or guardian be notified of the right to request a meeting with the school principal or designee of the school or school district.

(2) A requirement that the school first attempt to resolve the conflict before transferring a pupil, including, but not limited to, using restorative justice, counseling, or other services.

(3) Whether the decision to transfer a pupil is subject to periodic review and the procedure for conducting the review.

(4) The process to be used by the governing board of the school district to consider and approve or disapprove of the recommendation of the school principal or other school or school district designee to transfer the pupil.

(b) The governing board of the school district has provided notice of the policy to parents or guardians as part of the annual notification required pursuant to Section 48980.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (SB 1343)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Student Organizations [48930. - 48938.]

48930.

Any group of students may organize a student body association within the public schools with the approval and subject to the control and regulation of the governing board of the school district. Any such organization shall have as its purpose the conduct of activities on behalf of the students approved by the school authorities and not in conflict with the authority and responsibility of the public school officials. Any student body organization may be granted the use of school premises and properties without charge subject to such regulations as may be established by the governing board of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48931.

The governing board of any school district or any county office of education may authorize any pupil or adult entity or organization to sell food on school premises, subject to policy and regulations of the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall develop policy and regulations for the sale of food by any pupil or adult entity or organization, or any combination thereof, which shall ensure optimum participation in the school district’s or the county office of education’s nonprofit food service programs and shall be in consideration of all programs approved by the governing board of any school district or any county office of education. The policy and regulations shall be effective the first of the month following adoption by the State Board of Education.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting from the California Uniform Retail Food Facilities Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 113700) of Part 7 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code), food sales that are authorized pursuant to this section and that would otherwise be subject to the California Uniform Retail Food Facilities Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 40.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

48932.

The governing board of any school district may authorize any organization composed entirely of pupils attending the schools of the district to maintain such activities, including fund-raising activities, as may be approved by the governing board.

The governing board of any school district may, by resolution, authorize any student body organization to conduct fund-raising activities on school property during school hours provided that the governing board has determined that such activities will not interfere with the normal conduct of the schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48933.

(a) The funds of any student body organization established in the public schools of any school district shall, subject to approval of the governing board of the school district, be deposited or invested in one or more of the following ways:

(1) Deposits in a bank or banks, or other institution, whose accounts are federally insured.

(2) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state-chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, provided those associations are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.

(3) Purchase of repurchase agreements issued by savings and loan associations or banks.

(4) Purchase of bonds, notes, bills, certificates, debentures, or any other obligations issued by the United States of America.

(5) Shares or certificates for funds received or any form of evidence of interest or indebtedness issued by any credit union in this state, organized under the provisions of Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of the Financial Code or the statutes of the United States relating to credit unions insured by the administrator of the National Credit Union Administration or a comparable agency as provided by a state government.

(b) The funds shall be expended subject to such procedure as may be established by the student body organization subject to the approval of each of the following three persons, which shall be obtained each time before any of the funds may be expended: an employee or official of the school district designated by the governing board, the certificated employee who is the designated adviser of the particular student body organization, and a representative of the particular student body organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 115, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

48934.

The funds of a student body organization established in the public schools for kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, of any school district maintaining kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, may be used to finance activities for noninstructional periods or to augment or to enrich the programs provided by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48936.

In addition to deposit or investment pursuant to Section 48933, the funds of a student body organization may be loaned or invested in any of the following ways:

(a) Loans, with or without interest, to any student body organization established in another school of the district for a period not to exceed three years.

(b) Invest money in permanent improvements to any school district property including, but not limited to, buildings, automobile parking facilities, gymnasiums, swimming pools, stadia and playing fields, where such facilities, or portions thereof, are used for conducting student extracurricular activities or student spectator sports, or when such improvements are for the benefit of the student body. Such investment shall be made on condition that the principal amount of the investment plus a reasonable amount of interest thereon shall be returned to the student body organization as provided herein. Any school district approving such an investment shall establish a special fund in which moneys derived from the rental of school district property to student body organizations shall be deposited. Moneys shall be returned to the student body organization as contemplated by this section exclusively from such special fund and only to the extent that there are moneys in such special fund. Whenever there are no outstanding obligations against the special fund, all moneys therein may be transferred to the general fund of the school district by action of the local governing board.

Two or more student body organizations of the same school district may join together in making such investments in the same manner as is authorized herein for a single student body. Nothing herein shall be construed so as to limit the discretion of the local governing board in charging rental for use of school district property by student body organizations as provided in Section 48930.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48937.

The governing board of any school district shall provide for the supervision of all funds raised by any student body or student organization using the name of the school.

The cost of supervision may constitute a proper charge against the funds of the district.

The governing board of a school district may also provide for a continuing audit of student body funds with school district personnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48938.

In schools or classes for adults, regional occupational centers or programs, or in elementary, continuation, or special education schools in which the student body is not organized, the governing board may appoint an employee or official to act as trustee for student body funds and to receive these funds in accordance with procedures established by the board. These funds shall be deposited in a bank, a savings and loan association, a credit union, or any combination of these financial institutions, approved by the board and shall be expended subject to the approval of the appointed employee or official and also subject to the procedure that may be established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 430, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Speech and Other Communication [48950. - 48950.]

48950.

(a) A school district operating one or more high schools, a charter school, or a private secondary school shall not make or enforce a rule subjecting a high school pupil to disciplinary sanctions solely on the basis of conduct that is speech or other communication that, when engaged in outside of the campus, is protected from governmental restriction by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(b) A pupil who is enrolled in a school at the time that the school has made or enforced a rule in violation of subdivision (a) may commence a civil action to obtain appropriate injunctive and declaratory relief as
 determined by the court. Upon motion, a court may award attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff in a civil action pursuant to this section.

(c) This section does not apply to a private secondary school that is controlled by a religious organization, to the extent that the application of this section would not be consistent with the religious tenets of the organization.

(d) This section does not prohibit the imposition of discipline for harassment, threats, or intimidation, unless constitutionally protected.
